Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.800

Pledged bond retirement funds to be set aside from tuition and fees—1977 ex.s. c 322.

Notwithstanding any other section of chapter 322, Laws of 1977 ex. sess., the boards of regents and trustees of the respective institutions of higher education shall set aside from tuition and fees charged in each schedule an amount heretofore pledged and necessary for the purposes of bond retirement until such time as any such debt has been satisfied.

[ 1985 c 390 s 34; 1977 ex.s. c 322 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 322: See note following RCW 28B.15.065.